Illinois, session 104th, HB4962.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-5.01a as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-5.01a)7    Sec. 5-5.01a. Supportive living facilities program. 8    (a) The Department shall establish and provide oversight 9for a program of supportive living facilities that seek to 10promote resident independence, dignity, respect, and 11well-being in the most cost-effective manner.12    A supportive living facility is (i) a free-standing 13facility or (ii) a distinct physical and operational entity 14within a mixed-use building that meets the criteria 15established in subsection (d). A supportive living facility 16integrates housing with health, personal care, and supportive 17services and is a designated setting that offers residents 18their own separate, private, and distinct living units.19     Sites for the operation of the program shall be selected 20by the Department based upon criteria that may include the 21need for services in a geographic area, the availability of 22funding, and the site's ability to meet the standards. 23    (b) Beginning July 1, 2014, subject to federal approval,   HB4962- 2 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1the Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities shall be 2equal to the supportive living facility Medicaid rate 3effective on June 30, 2014 increased by 8.85%. Once the 4assessment imposed at Article V-G of this Code is determined 5to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the Social Security 6Act, the Department shall increase the Medicaid rates for 7supportive living facilities effective on July 1, 2014 by 89.09%. The Department shall apply this increase retroactively 9to coincide with the imposition of the assessment in Article 10V-G of this Code in accordance with the approval for federal 11financial participation by the Centers for Medicare and 12Medicaid Services. 13    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 14effective on July 1, 2017 must be equal to the rates in effect 15for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2017 increased by 162.8%. 17    The Medicaid rates for supportive living facilities 18effective on July 1, 2018 must be equal to the rates in effect 19for supportive living facilities on June 30, 2018. 20    Subject to federal approval, the Medicaid rates for 21supportive living services on and after July 1, 2019 must be at 22least 54.3% of the average total nursing facility services per 23diem for the geographic areas defined by the Department while 24maintaining the rate differential for dementia care and must 25be updated whenever the total nursing facility service per 26diems are updated. Beginning July 1, 2022, upon the   HB4962- 3 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1implementation of the Patient Driven Payment Model, Medicaid 2rates for supportive living services must be at least 54.3% of 3the average total nursing services per diem rate for the 4geographic areas. For purposes of this provision, the average 5total nursing services per diem rate shall include all add-ons 6for nursing facilities for the geographic area provided for in 7Section 5-5.2. The rate differential for dementia care must be 8maintained in these rates and the rates shall be updated 9whenever nursing facility per diem rates are updated. 10    Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 2024, 11the dementia care rate for supportive living services must be 12no less than the non-dementia care supportive living services 13rate multiplied by 1.5. 14    (b-5) Subject to federal approval, beginning January 1, 152025, Medicaid rates for supportive living services must be at 16least 54.75% of the average total nursing facility per diem 17rate for the geographic areas defined by the Department and 18shall include all add-ons for nursing facilities for the 19geographic area provided for in Section 5-5.2. 20    (c) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 21Section. Rules that establish or modify the services, 22standards, and conditions for participation in the program 23shall be adopted by the Department in consultation with the 24Department on Aging, the Department of Rehabilitation 25Services, and the Department of Mental Health and 26Developmental Disabilities (or their successor agencies).  HB4962- 4 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1    (d) Subject to federal approval by the Centers for 2Medicare and Medicaid Services, the Department shall accept 3for consideration of certification under the program any 4application for a site or building where distinct parts of the 5site or building are designated for purposes other than the 6provision of supportive living services, but only if: 7        (1) those distinct parts of the site or building are 8    not designated for the purpose of providing assisted 9    living services as required under the Assisted Living and 10    Shared Housing Act; 11        (2) those distinct parts of the site or building are 12    completely separate from the part of the building used for 13    the provision of supportive living program services, 14    including separate entrances; 15        (3) those distinct parts of the site or building do 16    not share any common spaces with the part of the building 17    used for the provision of supportive living program 18    services; and 19        (4) those distinct parts of the site or building do 20    not share staffing with the part of the building used for 21    the provision of supportive living program services. 22    (e) Facilities or distinct parts of facilities which are 23selected as supportive living facilities and are in good 24standing with the Department's rules are exempt from the 25provisions of the Nursing Home Care Act and the Illinois 26Health Facilities Planning Act.  HB4962- 5 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1    (f) Section 9817 of the American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 2(Public Law 117-2) authorizes a 10% enhanced federal medical 3assistance percentage for supportive living services for a 412-month period from April 1, 2021 through March 31, 2022. 5Subject to federal approval, including the approval of any 6necessary waiver amendments or other federally required 7documents or assurances, for a 12-month period the Department 8must pay a supplemental $26 per diem rate to all supportive 9living facilities with the additional federal financial 10participation funds that result from the enhanced federal 11medical assistance percentage from April 1, 2021 through March 1231, 2022. The Department may issue parameters around how the 13supplemental payment should be spent, including quality 14improvement activities. The Department may alter the form, 15methods, or timeframes concerning the supplemental per diem 16rate to comply with any subsequent changes to federal law, 17changes made by guidance issued by the federal Centers for 18Medicare and Medicaid Services, or other changes necessary to 19receive the enhanced federal medical assistance percentage. 20    (g) Sites for the operation of the program shall be 21selected by the Department based upon criteria that may 22include the need for services in a geographic area, the 23availability of funding, the site's ability to meet the 24standards, and a need to increase access for Medicaid 25enrollees who need an alternative to nursing home care. 26        (1) As used in this subsection, "need" means a   HB4962- 6 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1    demonstrated deficiency of supportive living program 2    operational sites, including dementia care support units, 3    within a specific geographic area allowing a 4    Medicaid-eligible population 65 years of age and older to 5    have an alternative to nursing facility care. The 6    Department shall determine need utilizing the most 7    recently available statewide report, described in 8    paragraph (2), to be conducted every 3 years by the 9    Department, and shall also take into consideration the 10    occupancy rates, vacancies, and waiting lists in 11    surrounding operational supportive living program sites, 12    and public comments. In the 90-day period following 13    publication of the statewide market study report, 14    stakeholders must have the opportunity to provide public 15    comment to the Department regarding the selection of 16    target geographic areas and other points for consideration 17    for both traditional conventional supportive living 18    operational sites as well as dementia care support sites. 19    Based on need, the Department shall make the final 20    determination to establish geographic areas utilizing 21    county or zip code-based geographic areas within a rate 22    setting region as the basis for opening a competitive 23    application process. All sites selected in each 24    competitive application year must have begun to meet 25    initial milestones established by the Department before 26    the next statewide market study report is published. No   HB4962- 7 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1    additional rounds of sites for operation shall be 2    established without a statewide market study report 3    published by the Department. The Department must propose 4    rules implementing this Section no later than 180 days 5    after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 6    104th General Assembly.7        (2) Beginning January 1, 2027, and every 3 years 8    thereafter, the Department must publish on its website a 9    statewide market study report which must be utilized by 10    the Department in determining when to solicit applications 11    for supportive living program sites in certain geographic 12    areas in accordance with this subsection. The statewide 13    market study report shall set forth the following:14            (A) The statewide market study report must define 15        a primary market area as a county, zip code, or 16        multiple contiguous zip codes. A primary market area 17        must not exceed a radius of:18                (i) 4 miles in Cook County (including the City 19            of Chicago);20                (ii) 12 miles in Alexander, Bond, Boone, 21            Calhoun, Champaign, Clinton, DeKalb, DuPage, 22            Fulton, Grundy, Henry, Jackson, Jersey, Johnson, 23            Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Lake, Macon, Macoupin, 24            Madison, Marshall, McHenry, McLean, Menard, 25            Mercer, Monroe, Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, 26            Sangamon, Stark, St. Clair, Tazewell, Vermilion,   HB4962- 8 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1            Will, Williamson, Winnebago, Woodford, or counties 2            with a population which exceeds 30,000; or3                (iii) 25 miles in all other counties.4            (B) The statewide market study report shall 5        identify the eligible population by analyzing age, 6        income, and acuity.7                (i) Required age cohorts are: 65 years old 8            through 74 years old, 75 years old through 84 9            years old, and 85 years old and older.10                (ii) Acuity as determined by using the 11            self-care difficulty rate published by Association 12            of University Centers on Disabilities' National 13            Center on Disability in Public Health, or the 14            prevalence of Alzheimer's and related dementia in 15            individuals 65 and older published by the current 16            Illinois Alzheimer's Disease State Plan.17                (iii) Annual income qualification of $35,000 18            or less. The income limit must be updated for 19            changes in the federal poverty level used for 20            Medicaid eligibility determination and asset 21            levels. When updating, the sum of income and 22            assets must be rounded up to the nearest $5,000. 23            For example, for 2025 a one-person Aid to the 24            Aged, Blind, or Disabled income level of $1,304 25            per month annualized to $15,648 plus the $17,500 26            asset level equals $33,148, which is rounded up to   HB4962- 9 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1            $35,000.2            (C) The statewide market study report must apply a 3        20% capture rate to determine the eligible population.4            (D) The statewide market study report must also 5        account for existing units at supportive living 6        program sites, including those that are approved but 7        not yet certified, and must consider whether existing 8        providers are fully utilized. In determining whether 9        the existing providers are utilized, the statewide 10        market study report shall consider occupancy based on 11        the most recent cost reports.12            (E) The Department must prioritize expansion in 13        the primary market areas where there are currently no 14        supportive living program sites and within the 15        following counties based on the number of units 16        needed:17                (i) Need must exceed 65 supportive living 18            program units in the City of Chicago, and the 19            counties of Alexander, Bond, Boone, Calhoun, 20            Champaign, Clinton, Cook, DeKalb, DuPage, Fulton, 21            Grundy, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Henry, Jackson, 22            Jersey, Johnson, Lake, Macon, Macoupin, Madison, 23            Marshall, McHenry, McLean, Menard, Mercer, Monroe, 24            Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, Sangamon, St. Clair, 25            Stark, Tazewell, Vermilion, Will, Williamson, 26            Winnebago, and Woodford.  HB4962- 10 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1                (ii) For all other counties, the need must 2            exceed 40 supportive living program units.3                (iii) The Department may accept applications 4            for expansion from existing supportive living 5            program providers in areas where the need is 18 6            supportive living program units or greater and can 7            be met by expansion of an existing supportive 8            living program provider location.9                (iv) Primary market areas with existing 10            supportive living program providers that have 11            occupancy below 90% as shown on the most recent 12            cost reports are ineligible for expansion.13            (F) The Department must also consider the 14        currently approved waiver capacity. Any expansion of 15        the supportive living program must not exceed approved 16        waiver capacity.17            (G) The Department must also consider public 18        comments prior to making any final determination 19        regarding whether to request applications for a 20        particular geographic area.21        (3) Within 6 months of publication of the first 22    statewide market study report, the approved, but not yet 23    certified, supportive living program sites must submit to 24    the Department:25            (A) a written update with milestones toward 26        operations; or   HB4962- 11 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1            (B) an application for a change of location 2        outside the originally identified market area. 3        (4) Approved, but not yet certified, supportive living 4    program sites must begin construction within 24 months of 5    the date of submission of the written update or approval 6    of the application for the change of location.7        (5) The Department may accept applications from 8    approved, but not yet certified, supportive living program 9    sites for a change of location outside the originally 10    identified market area when the current statewide market 11    study report demonstrates a need outside the original 12    market area as outlined in paragraph (2). The Department 13    must not accept any applications where the number of 14    units, including conventional and dementia care settings, 15    exceeds the number of units needed as identified by the 16    statewide market study report.17        (6) The Department must not accept any applications 18    for a change of location from approved, but not yet 19    certified, supportive living program sites when the 20    proposed location is outside the original market area and 21    within 8 miles of an existing supportive living program 22    site in Cook County, 12 miles of an existing supportive 23    living program site in Alexander, Bond, Boone, Calhoun, 24    Champaign, Clinton, DeKalb, DuPage, Fulton, Grundy, Henry, 25    Jackson, Jersey, Johnson, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Lake, 26    Macon, Macoupin, Madison, Marshall, McHenry, McLean,   HB4962- 12 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1    Menard, Mercer, Monroe, Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, 2    Sangamon, Stark, St. Clair, Tazewell, Vermilion, Will, 3    Williamson, Winnebago, or 25 miles of an existing 4    supportive living program site in all other counties.5        (7) Current supportive living program providers may 6    apply to the Department to convert a set number of 7    conventional apartments, not to exceed 20 apartments, into 8    dementia care settings. The application for such a request 9    must demonstrate a need for dementia care settings at the 10    provider's location supported by the most recently 11    available statewide market study report, and that the 12    conversion of units will not displace any person eligible 13    for supportive living services who is currently residing 14    in a supportive living program unit from the provider's 15    location. All dementia care unit conversions must meet the 16    criteria specific to certification as outlined in 89 Ill. 17    Adm. Code 146 Subparts B and Subpart E. The Department may 18    grant a waiver from specified provisions of 89 Ill. Adm. 19    Code 146 Subpart B and E, if the applicant or supportive 20    living program provider can demonstrate that an 21    alternative is available to ensure the residents' health, 22    safety, and welfare.23    All applications for the expansion of supportive living 24dementia care settings involving sites not approved by the 25Department by January 1, 2024 may allow new elderly 26non-dementia units in addition to new dementia care units. The   HB4962- 13 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1Department may approve such applications only if the 2application has: (1) no more than one non-dementia care unit 3for each dementia care unit and (2) the site is not located 4within 4 miles of an existing supportive living program site 5in Cook County (including the City of Chicago), not located 6within 12 miles of an existing supportive living program site 7in Alexander, Bond, Boone, Calhoun, Champaign, Clinton, 8DeKalb, DuPage, Fulton, Grundy, Henry, Jackson, Jersey, 9Johnson, Kane, Kankakee, Kendall, Lake, Macon, Macoupin, 10Madison, Marshall, McHenry, McLean, Menard, Mercer, Monroe, 11Peoria, Piatt, Rock Island, Sangamon, Stark, St. Clair, 12Tazewell, Vermilion, Will, Williamson, Winnebago, or Woodford 13counties, or not located within 25 miles of an existing 14supportive living program site in any other county. 15    (h) Beginning January 1, 2025, subject to federal 16approval, for a person who is a resident of a supportive living 17facility under this Section, the monthly personal needs 18allowance shall be $120 per month. 19    (i) As stated in the supportive living program home and 20community-based service waiver approved by the federal Centers 21for Medicare and Medicaid Services, and beginning July 1, 222025, the Department must maintain the rate add-on implemented 23on January 1, 2023 for the provision of 2 meals per day at no 24less than $6.15 per day. 25    (j) Subject to federal approval, the Department shall 26allow a certified medication aide to administer medication in   HB4962- 14 -LRB104 18551 KTG 31994 b1a supportive living facility. For purposes of this subsection, 2"certified medication aide" means a person who has met the 3qualifications for certification under Section 79 of the 4Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act and assists with 5medication administration while under the supervision of a 6registered professional nurse as authorized by Section 50-75 7of the Nurse Practice Act. The Department may adopt rules to 8implement this subsection. 9(Source: P.A. 103-102, Article 20, Section 20-5, eff. 1-1-24; 10103-102, Article 100, Section 100-5, eff. 1-1-24; 103-593, 11Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 100, 12Section 100-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-593, Article 165, Section 13165-5, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-886, eff. 148-9-24; 104-9, eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 159-12-25.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.